dev/ortho/cyr-ara.twol
Alphabet

а:ا 
ә:ە 
б:ب 
п:پ 
т:ت 
җ:ج 
ч:چ 
х:خ 
д:د 
р:ر 
з:ز 
ж:ژ 
с:س 
ш:ش 
ғ:غ 
ф:ف 
қ:ق 
к:ك 
г:گ 
ң:ڭ 
л:ل 
м:م 
н:ن 
һ:ھ 
о:و 
у:ۇ 
ө:ۆ 
ү:ۈ 
в:ۋ 
е:ې 
и:ى 
й:ي 
к:ک 
0:ئ
0:ي 
я:ا
ю:ۇ
;

Sets

AllInputs = а ә б п т җ ч х д р з ж с ш ғ ф қ к г ң л м н һ о у ө ү в е и й к я ю  ;

Vows = а ә о у ө ү е и ;
    
VowsYots =  а ә о у ө ү е и  я ю  ;

Yots = я ю ;

Rules

! This rule is actually a heuristic. Most words with VV sequences have a hamza 
! between them, but certain (mostly Mandarin?) loanwords don't: e.g., يۈەن
"Insert hamza before a vowel preceded by a vowel or word boundary"
0:ئ <=> [ .#. | VowsYots: ]  _ Vows: ;

"Insert y before yots" 
0:ي <=> [ .#. | AllInputs: ] _ Yots: ;
